verb/verb.xfst
################################################################################
#                                                                              #
# Writing Rules                                                                #
#                                                                              #
# 'Delete' deletes the precedent letter.                                       #
# 'NonDouble' prevents double vowels in endings                                #
# 'LastConsonant' prevents double consonant except 'ss' at the word end.       #
# 'hh', 'jj', 'kk', 'qq', 'vv', 'ww', 'xx' are uncommon and therefore not      #
# dealt with                                                                   #
# DuplicateTZ ensures consonant doubling in feminine past participle forms.    #
################################################################################
define Delete [[Vowel|Consonant] "*DEL" -> 0] .o. ["*DEL" -> 0];
define NonDouble [i "*DOUB" i -> i] .o. ["*DOUB" -> 0];
define LastConsonant [{bb} -> b, 
					  {cc}  -> c, 
                      {dd} -> d, 
                      {ff} -> f,
                      {gg} -> g,
                      {ll} -> l,
                      {mm} -> m,
 #                     {nn} -> n,
                      {pp} -> p,
                      {rr} -> r,
                      {tt} -> t,
                      {zz}  -> z  ||  _  ("@H") ("*EL")  .#.] ; 
#                       .o. 
#                        [{zz}  -> z  || _ ("@H") .#. ] .o.
#                       [{bb} "@H" -> b "@H",
#                       {dd} "@H" -> d "@H",
#                       {ff} "@H" -> f "@H",
#                       {gg} "@H" -> g "@H",
#                        {ll} "@H" -> l "@H",
#                        {mm} "@H" -> m "@H", 
#                       {nn} "@H" -> n "@H",
#                        {pp} "@H" -> p "@H",
#                        {rr} "@H" -> r "@H", 
#                     {tt} "@H" -> t "@H", 
#                      {zz} "@H" -> z "@H"
#                      ||  _  .#.];
# define LastConsonant [{zz}  -> z  || _ ("@H") ("*EL")  .#. ];
# Ensure vowel doubling in feminine forms
define DuplicateT [ {t@} -> {tt} || _ [a|{as}]];
define DuplicateZ [ {z@} -> {zz} || _ [a|{as}]];
define DuplicateTZ [DuplicateT .o. DuplicateZ];

################################################################################
#                                                                              #
# Suffixes and Endings                                                         #
#                                                                              #
# The suffigated pronouns can be found in Caduff&Caprez article 167;           #
# 210, 211 (ins); 212  (i/igl). The rules down here cover the cases when the   #
# verb ending is affected by the pronouns.                                     # 
# The ending -el can be found in Caduff&Caprez article 107                     #
# The conjunctive ending is explained in Caduff&Caprez article 110             #
################################################################################
# Suffigated pronoun "la"
define SuffLa1 ["*LA" -> 0 \/ .#. Consonant* Vowel+ _];
define SuffLa2 [{a} "*LA" -> 0];
define SuffLa3 ["*LA" -> 0];
define SuffLa [SuffLa1 .o. SuffLa2 .o. SuffLa3];

# Suffigated pronoun "i/igl"
define SuffIgl1 ["*IGL" i -> 0 \/ i .#. _];
define SuffIgl2 ["*IGL" -> 0 \/ .#. Consonant* Vowel+ _];
define SuffIgl3 [{a} "*IGL" -> 0];
define SuffIgl4 ["*IGL" -> 0];
define SuffIgl [SuffIgl1 .o. SuffIgl2 .o. SuffIgl3 .o. SuffIgl4];

# Endings before pronoun "ins"
define SuffIns1 ["*INS" -> {n} \/ {distingua}|{mia}|{gia}|{zia}|{paja} _];
define SuffIns2 ["*INS" -> {n} \/ .#. Consonant* Vowel+ _];
define SuffIns3 [{a} "*INS" -> {'}];
define SuffIns4 ["*INS" -> 0];
define SuffIns [SuffIns1 .o. SuffIns2 .o. SuffIns3 .o. SuffIns4];


################################################################################
# Dealing with -el variant in 1. person Sg indicative for verbs with 
################################################################################
# https://gitlab.cl.uzh.ch/siclemat/rumantsch-morphologie/issues/12
#  *  ir-Verben, die die 1. Person immer auf -esch bilden, bilden diese Variante nie (z.B. chavrir)
#   *  ar-Verben, die optional -esch haben, können auch die -el-Variante haben (z.B: enquadrar)
#   *  ir-Verben, die nicht auf -esch enden in der 1. Person und auf -vrir im Infinitiv, haben immer die -el-Variante
#   *  ar-Verben, die nicht obligatorisch auf -esch enden in der 1. Person und auf die folgenden Endungen enden haben die -el-Variante:
# 
#     * -brar, -crar, -drar, -grar -prar, -trar, vrar
#     * -blar, -clar, -dlar, -glar -plar,  -tlar, -vlar, 

#     * -flar --zlar -slar, -schlar,

define ElInsertionLeftContext [ #
	[[b|c|d|g|p|t|v] [r|l]] # both Cr and Cl  
	| [f|z|s|{sch}] l      # only Cl
	] ;

define OptEl1PSgInsertion [
[  [..] (->) {el}  ElInsertionLeftContext _ "+Verb" "+PresInd" "+1P" "+Sg" ]
];

define ArNoEl [{detasch}|{sau}|{reengasch}|{plazz}];
define IrNoEl [{runtg}];
define OptEl [{spigl}|{dasd}|{engasch}];
define OblEl [{franzl}|{chasti}|{regl} ];
# 1P. Sg. Ending -el
define EndEl0 ["*EL" (->) {el} \/ .#. OptEl ("@H" |"@I") _ ];
define EndEl00 ["*EL" -> {el} \/ .#. OblEl ("@H" |"@I") _ ];
define EndEl1 ["*EL" -> 0 \/ [Vowel {gl}| ArNoEl|IrNoEl] ("@H" |"@I") _ ];
define EndEl2 ["*EL" -> {el} \/ {g} "@I" _];
define EndEl3 ["*EL" -> {el} \/ .#. Consonant* Vowel+ ("@H") _];
define EndEl4 ["*EL" -> {el} \/ [{mi}|{zi} ] ("@H") _];
define EndEl5 ["*EL" -> {el} \/ [{li}|{giasch}|{plasch}|{tasch}|{distingu}] ("@H") _];
define EndEl6 ["*EL" (->) {el} \/ [Nonliquid {r}|{l}|{mn}|{vd}|{schn}|{ptg}|{tgn}|{uvr}|{sm}] ("@H" |"@I") _ ];
define EndEl7 ["*EL" -> 0];
define EndEl [EndEl0 .o. EndEl00 .o.EndEl1 .o. EndEl2 .o. EndEl3 .o. EndEl4 .o. EndEl5 .o. EndEl6 .o.
EndEl7];

# i/j in Conjunctive
define EndIj1 ["*IJ" -> 0 \/ [i|j] _];
define EndIj2 ["*IJ" -> {j} \/ Vowel _];
define EndIj3 ["*IJ" -> {i} ];
define EndIj [EndIj1 .o. EndIj2 .o. EndIj3];

# Collection
define PronounSuffigation [SuffLa .o. SuffIgl .o. SuffIns .o. EndEl .o. EndIj];

################################################################################
#                                                                              #
# Combination to Verb Forms                                                    #
#                                                                              #
################################################################################
define IrregularVerb [IrregularVerbRaw .o. Delete .o. NonDouble .o. LastConsonant];
define ChangingVerb [ChangingVerbRaw .o. Delete .o. NonDouble .o. LastConsonant
	.o. PronounSuffigation];
define PastPartIrregularV [ PastPartIrregRaw .o. DuplicateTZ ];
define RegularVerb [RegularVerbRaw .o. Delete .o. NonDouble .o. LastConsonant
	.o. PronounSuffigation];

define Verb [PastPartIrregularV .P. [IrregularVerb|ChangingVerb|RegularVerb]];

define VerbGuessing [VerbGuessRaw .o. Delete .o. NonDouble .o. LastConsonant
	.o. PronounSuffigation];

# Network for all implemented verbs
read regex Verb;
save stack fstbinaries/Verb.fst
clear stack

# Infinite network for the hypothetic verbs
read regex VerbGuessing ;
save stack fstbinaries/VerbGuessing.fst
